Washington statutes.
RCW 18.19.050

Powers of secretary—Application of uniform disciplinary act—Public education program.

(1) In addition to any other authority provided by law, the secretary has the following authority:

(a) To adopt rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary to implement this chapter;

(b) To set all registration, certification, and renewal fees in accordance with RCW 43.70.250 and to collect and deposit all such fees in the health professions account established under RCW 43.70.320;

(c) To establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this chapter;

(d) To hire clerical, administrative, and investigative staff as needed to implement this chapter;

(e) To issue a registration or certification to any applicant who has met the requirements for registration or certification; and

(f) To establish education equivalency, examination, supervisory, consultation, and continuing education requirements for certified counselors and certified advisers.

(2) The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs the issuance and denial of registrations and certifications and the discipline of registrants under this chapter. The secretary shall be the disciplining authority under this chapter.

(3) The department shall publish and disseminate information to educate the public about the responsibilities of counselors, the types of counselors, and the rights and responsibilities of clients established under this chapter. The secretary may assess an additional fee for each application and renewal to fund public education efforts under this section.

[ 2008 c 135 s 6; 2001 c 251 s 21; 1991 c 3 s 21; 1987 c 512 s 5.]

NOTES:

Severability—2001 c 251: See RCW 18.225.900.